Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 3
Uniform Benefits — Financing, Accounting, and Reporting Standards. [Repealed.]

24-3-101 — 24-3-426. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This chapter was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 151, § 9. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

24-3-101. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3301.

24-3-102. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 2; 1979, No. 650, §§ 1-3; 1983, No. 625, § 1; 1985, No. 271, § 2; 1985, No. 750, § 1; 1985, No. 910, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3302; Acts 1987, No. 493, § 2; 1989, No. 966, § 1; 1991, No. 208, §§ 1-3; 1991, No. 672, § 1; 1991, No. 845, § 2; 1991, No. 970, § 1; 1993, No. 403, § 16; 1993, No. 975, § 1; 1993, No. 1097, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 26(a); 1997, No. 485, § 3; 1997, No. 1137, § 1; 1999, No. 104, § 1.

24-3-103. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 6; 1981, No. 286, § 6; 1985, No. 994, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3306; Acts 1987, No. 732, §§ 1, 2; 1989, No. 718, § 1; 1991, No. 431, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 1; 2001, No. 67, § 1.

24-3-104. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 8; 1981, No. 286, § 7; 1985, No. 412, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3308; Acts 1987, No. 9, § 2; 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 52, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 2.

24-3-105. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 9; 1979, No. 892, § 1; 1981, No. 468, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 618, § 1; 1985, No. 486, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-3309, 12-3310.

24-3-106. Acts 1983, No. 625, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3311; Acts 1989, No. 669, § 1; 1997, No. 485, § 4; 1999, No. 325, § 10.

24-3-201. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 8; 1985, No. 938, §§ 9, 13; 1985, No. 994, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1987, No. 951, § 1; 1991, No. 208, § 4; 1991, No. 224, § 1; 1993, No. 432, § 1; 1993, No. 975, § 2; 1995, No. 628, § 1; 1995, No. 962, § 2; 1995, No. 1356, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 3; 1997, No. 318, § 2; 1997, No. 1053, § 22; 1999, No. 496, § 1.

24-3-202. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 14; 1981, No. 894, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

24-3-203. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1991, No. 661, § 1; 1993, No. 1200, § 1; 1997, No. 266, § 1.

24-3-204. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

24-3-205. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1987, No. 477, § 2; 1991, No. 432, § 1; 1997, No. 299, § 4; 1999, No. 39, § 1.

24-3-206. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 10; 1985, No. 938, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1987, No. 357, § 1; 1987, No. 737, § 2; 1993, No. 432, § 2; 1995, No. 1356, § 2; 1997, No. 299, § 5; 1997, No. 485, § 6; 1997, No. 1053, § 23.

24-3-207. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1995, No. 1356, § 3; 1997, No. 1053, § 24.

24-3-208. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1981, No. 894, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1995, No. 1356, § 4; 1997, No. 1053, § 25; 1999, No. 325, § 3; 1999, No. 868, § 2.

24-3-209. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650 § 11; 1981, No. 894, § 3; 1983, No. 637, § 2; 1983, No. 677, § 2; 1985, No. 938, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305; Acts 1991, No. 208, § 5; 1991, No. 463, § 1; 1991, No. 845, § 3; 1993, No. 432, §§ 3, 4; 1997, No. 299, § 6; 1999, No. 325, § 4; 1999, No. 1450, § 1.

24-3-210. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

24-3-212. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

24-3-213. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

24-3-214. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 3; 1979, No. 650, § 4; 1980 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 58, § 1; 1981, No. 482, § 1; 1981, No. 894, § 1; 1983, No. 677, § 4; 1985, No. 938, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3303; Acts 1993, No. 432, § 5; 1993, No. 1091, § 1.

24-3-215. Acts 1985, No. 310, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3303.1; Acts 1995, No. 666, § 1.

24-3-216. Acts 1987, No. 187, §§ 3, 4, 8, 9; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 1.

24-3-217. Acts 1987, No. 717, §§ 2-4; 1987 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 17, § 2; 1991, No. 1141, § 1.

24-3-218. Acts 1995, No. 738, § 2.

24-3-301. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 4; 1981, No. 894, § 2; 1983, No. 677, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3304; Acts 1991, No. 208, § 6; 1991, No. 845, § 1; 1995, No. 1356, § 5; 1997, No. 485, § 7; 1999, No. 1587, § 1.

24-3-302. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 4; 1979, No. 650, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3304; Acts 1989, No. 160, § 1.

24-3-303. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 4; 1979, No. 650, § 7; 1981, No. 482, § 2; 1983, No. 679, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3304; Acts 1995, No. 949, § 3; 1997, No. 857, § 3; 1999, No. 325, § 5; 1999, No. 537, § 3.

24-3-304. Acts 1999, No. 868, § 1.

24-3-401. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 1.

24-3-402. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1981, No. 495, §§ 1, 2; 1983, No. 434, § 1; 1983, No. 678, § 1; 1985, No. 412, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 2.

24-3-404. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

24-3-405. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

24-3-406. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

24-3-408. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1981, No. 495, § 4; 1985, No. 412, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

24-3-409. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1989, No. 153, § 1; 1991, No. 222, § 1.

24-3-414. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1985, No. 412, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 3.

24-3-415. Acts 1979, No. 522, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.1.

24-3-417. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-418. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-419. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-420. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-421. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-422. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-423. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4; 1999, No. 555, § 11.

24-3-424. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-425. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

24-3-426. Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 4.

Section 24-3-103 was amended by Acts 2001, No. 67, and repealed by Acts 2001, No. 151. The repeal by Acts 2001, No. 151, was deemed to supersede the amendment by Acts 2001, No. 67.

Section 24-3-107, concerning benefits for State Capitol Police, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 325, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 1097, §§ 2,3; 1997, No. 485, § 5.

Section 24-3-211, concerning limitations on benefits to employed retirant, was repealed by Acts 1987, No. 525, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 793, § 5; 1979, No. 650, § 12; 1981, No. 894, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3305.

Section 24-3-403, concerning investment authority and limitations and required recommendation, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1989, No. 302, § 1.

Section 24-3-407, concerning investment authority and limitations and competitive awards, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 7. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1981, No. 495, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1989, No. 302, § 2.

Sections 24-3-410 — 24-3-413, concerning investment authority and limitations and investment counsel; prudent investor rule; loan of securities and covered call options, were repealed by Acts 1997, No. 1194, § 7. The sections were derived from the following sources:

24-3-410. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1985, No. 1009, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1989, No. 302, § 3; 1993, No. 403, § 17.

24-3-411. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1985, No. 412, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

24-3-412. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1981, No. 495, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307; Acts 1989, No. 652, § 10.

24-3-413. Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1981, No. 495, § 6; 1983, No. 434, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3307.

Section 24-3-416, concerning divestment of investments in South Africa, was repealed by Acts 1994 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 52, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1977, No. 793, § 7; 1987, No. 9, § 1.

For present law, see §§ 24-2-601 et seq. and 24-2-701 et seq.